Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,150
Foreign corporation; effect of certificate of authority.

(a) A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact business in this state subject, however, to the right of the state to revoke the certificate as provided in the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act.

(b) A foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same rights and enjoys the same privileges as a domestic corporation of like character. A foreign corporation is also, except as otherwise provided by the act, subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on a domestic corporation of like character.

(c) The act does not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 150.